Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5471.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Children
and Families shall establish a sick leave bank for Michelle Joseph, an employee of the
department. Any employee of the department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal
or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Michelle Joseph. If Michelle Joseph terminates
employment with the department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time
in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank
days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the
establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the department.
of 1